Louisiana, session 2026, HB184.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:2625(A)(1)(introductory paragraph) is hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 46:2622(19) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2622. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
* * *
(19) "Charitable pharmacy" means the practice of a pharmacy at a site where
prescriptions are dispensed by a charitable organization free of charge to
appropriately screened and qualified patients.
* * *
§2625. Fees on healthcare providers; disposition of fees
A.(1) The Louisiana Department of Health is hereby authorized to adopt and
impose fees for healthcare services provided by the Medicaid program on every
nursing facility, every intermediate care facility for people with developmental
disabilities, every pharmacy in the state of Louisiana except for charitable
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-226 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 184
pharmacies and certain out-of-state pharmacies, dispensing physicians, and medical
transportation providers. The amount of any fee shall not exceed the total cost to the
state of providing the healthcare service subject to such fee. In addition, the amount
of the fees imposed under the rules and regulations adopted shall not exceed the
following:
* * *